California statutes. Civil Code
(f) “Notice” to a creditor means written notice deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the creditor at the location where payments on the loan or credit transaction are normally required to be sent by the debtor. A creditor may elect to require that written notice, otherwise complying with the requirements of this subdivision, be sent to a different location or may elect to accept telephonic
 notice to a telephone number specified by the creditor, in either case in lieu of notice being sent to the location where payments are regularly required to be sent, if that location or telephone number is clearly and conspicuously disclosed as the proper place to direct any notice to the creditor relating to any claim of disability on each monthly billing, or on or in each payment coupon book (by adhesive attachment, republication, or otherwise), as the case may be, or (if payments are automatically deducted from an account of the debtor) on the annual statement of loan activity. In any particular instance a creditor may waive the requirement that notice be in writing and accept oral notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.402.

(a) No creditor, as defined in Section 1812.401, shall invoke any creditor’s remedy against a debtor because of the debtor’s nonpayment of any sum which becomes due during any disability claim period and for which credit disability insurance coverage, subject to this title, is provided.

(b) Upon initially receiving notice, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1812.401, of the debtor’s claim of disability, the creditor shall inform the debtor in writing of the name, address, and telephone number of the insurer or its designated
 representative from whom the debtor may obtain claim forms. Upon receiving notice of the disability claim, the insurer or its designated representative shall send necessary claim forms to the debtor. The debtor shall submit the claim to the insurer or its designated representative and shall notify the creditor, as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 1812.401, that a claim has been submitted.

This subdivision shall apply to the original creditor who sold the disability insurance and shall not apply to that creditor’s successor in interest if the successor in interest (1) is not related by common ownership or control to that creditor and (2) has no information regarding the name, address, and telephone number of the insurer or its designated representative.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a creditor from invoking any creditor’s remedy during or after the claim period for the debtor’s nonpayment
 of any sum due prior to the claim period, whether or not the nonpayment is related to the claimed disability, or for the debtor’s nonpayment of any interest, finance charge, or late charge accruing during the claim period of any sum due prior to the period.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a creditor from foreclosing a lien on any property to protect that creditor’s security interest if a senior lienholder on that property (1) has initiated the foreclosure of its lien, (2) is not prohibited from continuing the foreclosure by any law or order of court, or (3) will not otherwise suspend or delay its foreclosure proceeding until after the disability claim period.

(e) If the insurer pays the claim within the disability claim period, the creditor shall treat each payment made by the insurer as though it were timely made by the debtor. If the insurer rejects the claim within the
 disability claim period or accepts the claim within the claim period as a partial disability which results in a payment of less than the full benefit which would be paid for the total disability, the debtor shall have the opportunity to pay the entire amount which became due during the claim period or the difference between the amount which became due during the claim period and the amount paid by the insurer for the partial disability without being subject to any creditor’s remedy, except the imposition of late charges, for 35 days following the date on which the insurer sends notice of the rejection of the claim or acceptance of the claim as a partial disability. In the event the debtor does not pay the entire amount which became due during the claim period plus any accrued late charges within 35 days from that date, the creditor may then invoke any creditor’s remedy.

(f) The obligations of the creditor and debtor pursuant to this section
 shall be disclosed in writing in at least 10-point type by the creditor to the debtor at the time the creditor sells the insurance, in the manner provided in paragraph (1), and by the insurer to the debtor at the time the insurer sends claim forms pursuant to subdivision (b), in the manner provided in paragraph (2).

(1) The disclosure required by the creditor shall be substantially in the following form: 
CLAIM PROCEDURE
If you become disabled, tell us (your creditor) right away. (We advise you to send this information to the same address to which you are normally required to send your payments, unless a different address or telephone number is given to you in writing by us as the location where we would like to be notified.) We will tell you where to get claim forms. Send
 in the completed form to the insurance company as soon as possible and tell us as soon as you do.

If your disability insurance covers all of your missed payment, WE CANNOT TRY TO COLLECT WHAT YOU OWE OR FORECLOSE UPON OR REPOSSESS ANY COLLATERAL UNTIL THREE CALENDAR MONTHS AFTER your first missed payment is due or until the insurance company pays or rejects your claim, whichever comes first. We can, however, try to collect, foreclose, or repossess if you have money due and owing us or are otherwise in default when your disability claim is made or if a senior mortgage or lien holder is foreclosing.

If the insurance company pays the claim within the three calendar months, we must accept the money as though you paid on time. If the insurance company rejects the claim within the three calendar months or accepts the claim within the three calendar months as a partial disability and pays less than for a total disability, you will
 have 35 days from the date that the rejection or the acceptance of the partial disability claim is sent to pay past due payments, or the difference between past due payments and what the insurance company pays for the partial disability, plus late charges. You can contact us, and we will tell you how much you owe. After that time, we can take action to collect or foreclose or repossess any collateral you may have given.

If the insurance company accepts your claim but requires that you send in additional forms to remain eligible for continued payments, you should send in these completed additional forms no later than required. If you do not send in these forms on time, the insurance company may stop paying, and we will then be able to take action to collect or foreclose or repossess any collateral you may have given. 

(2) The disclosure required by the insurer shall be substantially in the
 following form: 
CLAIM PROCEDURE
Send in the completed form to the insurance company as soon as possible and tell your creditor as soon as you do. (Your creditor has already advised you of the address or telephone number to use to confirm that you have submitted your completed form to the insurance company.)

If your disability insurance covers all of your missed payments, YOUR CREDITOR CANNOT TRY TO COLLECT WHAT YOU OWE OR FORECLOSE UPON OR REPOSSESS ANY COLLATERAL UNTIL THREE CALENDAR MONTHS AFTER your first missed payment is due or until the insurance company pays or rejects your claim, whichever comes first. Your creditor can, however, try to collect, foreclose, or repossess if you have money due and owing or are otherwise in default when your disability claim is made or if a senior mortgage
 or lienholder is foreclosing.

If the insurance company pays the claim within the three calendar months, your creditor must accept the money as though you paid on time. If the insurance company rejects the claim within the three calendar months or accepts the claim within the three calendar months as a partial disability and pays less than for a total disability, you will have 35 days from the date that the rejection or the acceptance of the partial disability claim was sent to pay past due payments, or the difference between past due payments and what the insurance company pays for the partial disability, plus late charges. You can contact your creditor who will tell you how much you owe. After that time, your creditor can take action to collect or foreclose or repossess any collateral you may have given.

If the insurance company accepts your claim, but requires that you send in additional forms to remain eligible for
 continued payments, you should send in these completed additional forms no later than required. If you do not send in these forms on time, the insurance company may stop paying, and your creditor will then be able to take action to collect or foreclose or repossess any collateral you have given. 

(g) If a debtor does not make a payment for which the debtor claims disability coverage arising from a then current disability and if the creditor, after sending the debtor notice of the debtor’s delinquency, invokes any creditor’s remedy because of the nonpayment without knowledge of the debtor’s claim of disability coverage, subject to this title, the following provisions apply:

(1) Upon receiving notice of the debtor’s claim, the creditor shall not invoke any further creditor’s remedy during the remainder of the claim period and the period provided in subdivision (e).

(2) Upon receiving notice, as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 1812.401, of the debtor’s claim, the creditor shall rescind every creditor’s remedy that has been invoked relating to the delinquency for which coverage is claimed, except that the creditor shall not be obligated to restore property which has been sold in a bona fide lawful sale to any person not related by common ownership or control to the creditor.

(3) The debtor shall be liable for costs and expenses actually incurred in connection with the invocation or rescission of any creditor’s remedy.

(4) The creditor shall not be in violation of this title and shall not be liable under subdivision (i) provided the creditor complies with paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision.

(h) The
 rights and remedies afforded debtors by this title shall be cumulative to each other and to all other rights and remedies which the debtors may have under other laws.

(i) The debtor may bring an action for damages, equitable relief, or other relief for any violation of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.403.

A creditor may invoke any creditor’s remedy 15 days after receiving notice that the insurer has ceased making payments on a credit disability insurance claim because of the debtor’s failure to timely submit any forms required by the insurer for recertification of a temporary disability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.404.

This title shall apply to a creditor only if the creditor, the predecessor to the right, title, or interest of the creditor, or the representative of either of them directly arranges or participates in the sale or receives a commission or other compensation for the sale of credit disability insurance to the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.405.

This title shall not prohibit a creditor from invoking any creditor’s remedy as a result of a debtor’s nonpayment when due of any amount obtained under an open-end credit plan, as hereafter defined, after the debtor has given notice of a disability claim unless the nonpayment is related to a covered disability then affecting the debtor other than the disability previously claimed. The creditor’s termination of the open-end credit plan because the debtor does not meet the creditor’s customary credit standards at the time the debtor notifies the creditor of the disability claim is not a creditor’s remedy.

An
 “open-end credit plan” means credit extended by a creditor under a plan in which the creditor reasonably contemplates repeated transactions, the creditor may impose a finance charge from time to time on an outstanding unpaid balance, and the amount of credit that may be extended to the debtor during the term of the plan (up to any limit set by the creditor) is generally made available to the extent that any outstanding balance is repaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.406.

(a) This title does not apply to credit disability insurance covering a key person, as hereinafter defined, which a creditor requires as a condition to making a loan of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to be used in the operation of a business in which the key person is employed or has an ownership interest.

For the purposes of this subdivision, a “key person” is a person who the creditor and the debtor or debtors mutually agree must be involved in the operation of the business to assure its success.

(b) This title does not apply to a loan or other credit transaction (including an open line of credit) of more than 10 years’ duration which is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust unless (1) the principal purpose of the loan or credit transaction is for the construction (other than initial construction), rehabilitation, or improvement (including “home improvement” as defined in Section 7151 of the Business and Professions Code) of real property consisting of four or fewer residential units, and (2) any document incident to the loan or credit transaction at the time the loan or extension of credit is made, or any course of dealing between the creditor and a contractor or material supplier assisting the borrower in obtaining the loan or extension of credit, would indicate that purpose.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to debtors who were entitled to receive notice from the creditor
 pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1812.402 on or after January 1, 1984, and prior to the effective date of the act which added this subdivision, unless the debtor receives written notice that the remedies provided in this title are revoked, the debtor is given an opportunity to cancel the coverage, and no claim has been made or notice provided as specified in Section 1812.401. If the debtor fails to cancel the insurance following receipt of the notice required under this subdivision, subdivision (b) shall apply to that policy upon payment by the debtor of the next installment of premium, whether to the insurer or to a creditor pursuant to a premium finance agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 3.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.407.

The provisions of this title shall apply to the nonpayment of any sum which becomes due on or after April 1, 1984, and for which the debtor claims disability coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.408.

Any waiver by the debtor of the provisions of this title shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.409.

This title shall not affect or defeat an interest in the debtor’s property, acquired after the creditor invokes a creditor’s remedy in violation of this title, by a bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer for value and without notice of facts that constitute a violation of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 4.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.410.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, the remainder of the title and the application of the provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1812.409 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1200, Sec. 5.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.91. EMPLOYMENT AGENCY, EMPLOYMENT COUNSELING, AND JOB LISTING SERVICES ACT [1812.500. - 1812.544.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1812.500. - 1812.502.]

1812.500.

This title shall be known and cited as the Employment Agency, Employment Counseling, and Job Listing Services Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.501.

(a) (1) “Employment agency” or “agency” means:

(A) Any person who, for a fee or other valuable consideration to be paid, directly or indirectly by a jobseeker, performs, offers to perform, or represents it can or will perform any of the following services:

(i) Procures, offers, promises, or attempts to procure
employment or engagements for others or employees for employers.

(ii) Registers persons seeking to procure or retain employment or engagement.

(iii) Gives information as to where and from whom this help, employment, or engagement may be procured.

(iv) Provides employment or engagements.

(B) Any person who offers, as one of its main objects or purposes, to procure employment for any person who will pay for its services, or that collects dues, tuition, or membership or registration fees of any sort, if the main object of the person paying those fees is to secure employment.

(C) Any person who, for a fee or other valuable consideration, procures, offers, promises, provides, or attempts to
procure babysitting or domestic employment for others or domestics or babysitters for others.

(2) “Employment agency” or “agency” shall not include any employment counseling service or any job listing service.

(b) (1) “Employment counseling service” means any person who offers, advertises, or represents it can or will provide any of the following services for a fee: career counseling, vocational guidance, aptitude testing, executive consulting, personnel consulting, career management, evaluation, or planning, or the development of résumés and other promotional materials relating to the preparation for employment. “Employment counseling service” shall not include persons who provide services strictly on an hourly basis with no financial obligation required of the consumer beyond the hourly fee for services rendered. An “employment counseling service” does not
include the functions of an “employment agency” as defined in subdivision (a).

(2) “Employment counseling service” does not include:

(A) Businesses that are retained by, act solely on behalf of, and are compensated solely by prior or current employers that do not require any “customer” to sign a contract and do not in any way hold any “customer” liable for fees.

(B) (i) Any provider of vocational rehabilitation in which the counseling services are paid for by insurance benefits, if the counseling is provided as a result of marital dissolution or separation proceedings to prepare one of the spouses for reentry into the job market and if the fees are paid by some party other than the person receiving the counseling services.

(ii) The
exemption provided in this subparagraph does not apply to any vocational rehabilitation counselor who receives any payments directly from the individual customer receiving the counseling.

(C) Any person who engages solely in the preparation of résumés and cover letters, provided that the résumé writing service does not advertise or hold itself out as offering other job seeking or placement services and does not charge more than three hundred dollars ($300) for any résumé, cover letter, or combination of both to any single customer in any individual transaction.

(D) Any public educational institution.

(E) Any private educational institution established solely for educational purposes that, as a part of its curriculum, offers employment counseling to its student body and conforms to the requirements of Article 3.5
(commencing with Section 94760) of Chapter 7 of Part 59 of the Education Code.

(F) A psychologist or psychological corporation licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, providing psychological assessment, career or occupational counseling, or consultation and related professional services within his, her, or its scope of practice.

(G) An educational psychologist licensed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 4986) of Chapter 13 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, providing counseling services within his or her scope of practice.

(c) “Job listing service” means any person who provides, offers, or represents it can or will provide any of the following services, for a fee or other valuable consideration to be paid,
directly or indirectly, by the jobseeker in advance of, or contemporaneously with, performance of these services: matches jobseekers with employment opportunities, providing or offering to provide jobseekers lists of employers or lists of job openings or like publications, or preparing résumés or lists of jobseekers for distribution to potential employers.

(d) A “nurses’ registry” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1812.524 is an employment agency. However, unless otherwise provided for in this title, a nurses’ registry shall not be required to comply with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1812.503) regulating employment agencies but, instead, shall be required to comply with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1812.524).

(e) “Jobseeker” means a person seeking employment.

(f) “Employer” means any individual,
company, partnership, association, corporation, agent, employee, or representative for whom or for which an employment agency or job listing service attempts to obtain an employee or to place a jobseeker.

(g) “Job order” means any written or oral instruction, direction, or permission granted by an employer or its agent to an employment agency or job listing service to refer jobseekers for a specified job.

(h) “Domestic agency” means any agency that provides, or attempts to provide, employment by placement of domestic help in private homes.

(i) “Deposit” means any money or valuable consideration received by an employment agency or job listing service from a jobseeker for referring the jobseeker to a position of employment prior to the jobseeker’s acceptance of a position.

(j) “Fee” means:

(1) Any money or other valuable consideration paid, or promised to be paid, for services rendered or to be rendered by any person conducting an employment agency, employment counseling service, or job listing service under this title.

(2) Any money received by any person in excess of that which has been paid out by him or her for transportation, transfer of baggage, or board and lodging for any applicant for employment.

(k) “Registration fee” means any charge made, or attempted to be made, by an employment agency for registering or listing an applicant for employment, for letter writing, or any charge of a like nature made, or attempted to be made without having a bona fide order for the placement of the applicant in a position.

(l) “Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, association, or other organization.

(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.502.

(a) This title does not apply to any person who provides any of the services described in subdivision (a) of Section 1812.501 and who charges fees exclusively to employers for those services. The exemption from regulation provided by this subdivision does not apply to any person who provides babysitting or domestic employment for others. This subdivision does not apply to an employment counseling service as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1812.501.

(b) This title shall not apply to any nonprofit corporation, organized for the purpose of economic adjustment,
civic betterment, and the giving of vocational guidance and placement to its members, or others, including employment counseling services, when all of the following conditions exist:

(1) None of the directors, officers, or employees thereof receive any profit other than a nominal salary for services performed for the organization or corporation.

(2) No fee is charged for those services, though a voluntary contribution may be requested.

(3) Membership dues or fees charged are used solely for maintenance of the organization or corporation.

(c) Nothing in this title shall apply to a nonprofit corporation which has been formed in good faith for the promotion and advancement of the general professional interests of its members and which maintains a placement
service principally engaged in securing employment for such members with the state or any county, city, district or other public agency under contracts providing employment for one year or longer, or any nonprofit corporation exempted by subdivision (b).

(d) This title shall not apply to a labor organization as defined in Section 1117 of the Labor Code, a newspaper of general circulation, bona fide newsletter, magazine, trade or professional journal, or other publication of general circulation, the main purpose of which is dissemination of news, reports, trade or professional information, or information not intended to assist in locating, securing, or procuring employment or assignments for others.

(e) As used in this title, “employment agency” or “agency” does not include a nursing school, business school, or vocational school, except that if such a school charges a fee for
placement, the school shall be an employment agency within the meaning of this title.

(f) (1) A job listing service which meets the requirements specified in paragraph (2) or (3) shall not be subject to any of the following: Sections 1812.515, 1812.516, 1812.517, and 1812.518; subdivisions (a) and (b), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and subdivision (d) of Section 1812.519; paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 1812.520; and Section 1812.521.

(2) A job listing service shall be exempt pursuant to paragraph (1) if it complies with all of the following:

(A) Does not provide, offer, or imply the offer of, services related to employment.

(B) Does not offer or sell lists of employers
or job openings to jobseekers on an in-person basis.

(C) Maintains records of all its advertisements, identified by date and publication, and the sources of information used for the preparation of lists of employers and job openings, from which can be determined the accuracy of any statistics regarding success rate or similar statistics used in its advertising, promotional materials, or oral or written statements to jobseekers.

(D) Identifies, on each list of employers and job openings, its general source of information for jobs included on that list when the source of information is a publication or other public record.

(E) Provides, at or before the time of delivery of the list, a prominent written statement to the jobseeker granting the jobseeker a right to return the list for an immediate refund of the purchase
price during a stated period of time which expires not less than 10 days from the date of delivery of the list. The list shall be deemed returned upon delivery to the address from which it was obtained or upon deposit in the mail properly addressed to that address, with postage prepaid.

(3) A job listing service shall be exempt pursuant to paragraph (1) if it complies with all of the following:

(A) A majority interest in the job listing service is owned by one or more colleges or universities, or alumni associations affiliated therewith, and each college or university is accredited by both (i) an accrediting agency recognized as such by the United States Department of Education and (ii) a member organization of the Council of Postsecondary Accreditation.

(B) The job listing service provides services related to
employment exclusively for jobseekers who are the alumni of colleges or universities specified in subparagraph (A).

(C) The job listing service does not require, as a condition to receiving employment services, that the applicant have completed courses or examinations beyond the requirements for graduation from the college or university specified in subparagraph (A).

(D) More than 50 percent of the annual revenues received by the job listing service are derived from paid subscriptions of prospective employers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1256, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Employment Agencies [1812.503. - 1812.5095.]

1812.503.

(a) Every employment agency subject to this title shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond shall be three thousand dollars ($3,000). A copy of the bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the people of the State of California and shall be conditioned that the person obtaining the bond will comply with this title
and will pay all sums due any individual or group of individuals when the person or his or her representative, agent, or employee has received those sums. The bond shall be for the benefit of any person or persons damaged by any violation of this title or by fraud, dishonesty, misstatement, misrepresentation, deceit, unlawful acts or omissions, or failure to provide the services of the employment agency in performance of the contract with the jobseeker, by the employment agency or its agents, representatives, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment.

(c) (1) No employment agency shall conduct any business without having a current surety bond in the amount prescribed by this title and filing a copy of the bond with the Secretary of State.

(2) Thirty days prior to the cancellation or termination of any surety bond required by this section,
the surety shall send a written notice of that cancellation or termination to both the employment agency and the Secretary of State, identifying the bond and the date of cancellation or termination.

(3) If any employment agency fails to obtain a new bond and file a copy of that bond with the Secretary of State by the effective date of the cancellation or termination of the former bond, the employment agency shall cease to conduct any business unless and until a new surety bond is obtained and a copy of that bond is filed with the Secretary of State.

(d) When a deposit has been made in lieu of the bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person asserting a claim against the deposit shall, in lieu of Section 996.430 of the Code of Civil Procedure, establish the claim by furnishing evidence to the Secretary of State of a money judgment entered by a court
together with evidence that the claimant is a person described in subdivision (b).

(e) When a claimant has established the claim with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall review and approve the claim and enter the date of approval thereon. The claim shall be designated an “approved claim.”

(f) When the first claim against a particular deposit has been approved, it shall not be paid until the expiration of a period of 240 days after the date of its approval by the Secretary of State. Subsequent claims that are approved by the Secretary of State within the same 240-day period shall similarly not be paid until the expiration of the 240-day period. Upon the expiration of the 240-day period, the Secretary of State shall pay all approved claims from that 240-day period in full unless the deposit is insufficient, in which case each approved claim shall be paid a pro rata
share of the deposit.

(g) When the Secretary of State approves the first claim against a particular deposit after the expiration of a 240-day period, the date of approval of that claim shall begin a new 240-day period to which subdivision (f) shall apply with respect to any amount remaining in the deposit.

(h) After a deposit is exhausted, no further claims shall be paid by the Secretary of State. Claimants who have had their claims paid in full or in part pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) shall not be required to return funds received from the deposit for the benefit of other claimants.

(i) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond, the amount of the deposit shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution with respect to an action or judgment against the employment agency, other than as to an
amount as no longer needed or required for the purpose of this title that would otherwise be returned to the employment agency by the Secretary of State.

(j) The Secretary of State shall retain a cash deposit for two years from the date the Secretary of State receives written notification from the assignor of the deposit that the assignor has ceased to engage in the business of an employment agency or has filed a bond pursuant to subdivision (a), provided that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. This written notice shall include all of the following: (1) name, address, and telephone number of the assignor; (2) name, address, and telephone number of the bank at which the deposit is located; (3) account number of the deposit; and (4) a statement whether the assignor is ceasing to engage in the business of an employment agency or has filed a bond with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall forward an acknowledgment
of receipt of the written notice to the assignor at the address indicated therein, specifying the date of receipt of the written notice and anticipated date of release of the deposit, provided there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(k) A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of two years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit or order the Secretary of State to retain the deposit for a sufficient period beyond the two years pursuant to subdivision (j) to resolve outstanding claims against the deposit account.

(l) The Secretary of State shall charge a filing fee not to exceed the cost of filing the bond or deposit filed in lieu of a bond as set forth in Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(m) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this chapter that govern the filing and maintenance of bonds and deposits in lieu of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.504.

(a) Every employment agency shall give a written contract to every jobseeker from whom a fee or deposit is to be received, whether directly or indirectly. The original of the contract shall be given to the jobseeker at the time the jobseeker signs the contract and before the employment agency accepts any fee or deposit or the jobseeker becomes obligated to pay any such fee or deposit. The contract shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone
number of the employment agency, and, if the employment agency has more than one office or location, the address and telephone number of the principal office or location providing services to the jobseeker.

(2) The name and address of the person giving the order for help, the date and consecutive number of the receipt of the order by the agency, and its manner of transmission.

(3) The name of the jobseeker, the name and address of the person to whom the jobseeker is sent for employment, and the address where the jobseeker is to report for employment.

(4) The date and consecutive number of the contract.

(5) The amount of the fee to be charged and to be collected from the jobseeker, including a statement that if the employment is terminated, the fee may
not exceed gross earnings of the jobseeker in that employment, and the amount of the fee paid or advanced by the prospective employer and by whom paid or advanced.

(6) The kind of work or employment.

(7) The daily hours of work; the wages or salary, including any consideration or privilege; the benefits; and any other conditions of employment.

(8) If any labor trouble exists at the place of employment, that fact shall be stated in the contract.

(9) A contract expiration date which shall not be later than 180 days from the date of the referral or signing of the contract, whichever occurs first; however, a domestic agency operating as a registry may enter into a continuing contract subject to termination by written notice by either the domestic worker or
the agency.

(10) Any other term, condition, or understanding agreed upon between the agency and the jobseeker.

(11) The following statement, with the caption in type no smaller than 10-point boldfaced type and the remainder in a size no smaller than that generally used throughout the contract, and in full capitals, boldface, or italics: 
RIGHT TO REFUND
“If you pay all or any portion of a fee and fail to accept employment, the employment agency shall, upon your request, return the amount paid to you within 48 hours after your request for a refund.

“If you leave employment for just cause or are discharged for reasons other than misconduct connected with your work within 90 days from the
starting date of employment, the agency shall reduce your fee to that payable for temporary employment and shall refund any excess paid within 10 days of your request for a refund.

“No fee larger than that for temporary employment may be charged to you for employment lasting 90 days or less unless the agency’s fee schedules, contracts, and agreements provide for a further charge if you leave employment without just cause or are discharged for misconduct in connection with your work.

“If any refund due is not made within the time limits set forth above, the employment agency shall pay you an additional sum equal to the amount of the refund.” 

(b) All contracts shall be dated and shall be made and numbered consecutively, both copies to be signed by the jobseeker and the person acting for the employment agency. The original shall be given to the jobseeker
and one copy shall be kept on file at the employment agency.

(c) The full agreement between the parties shall be contained in a single document containing those elements set forth in this section.

(d) When a referral is made by telephone the agency shall execute the contract or receipt in triplicate and shall mail the original and duplicate to the jobseeker on the day the referral is made, with instructions that they be signed by the jobseeker and the duplicate returned to the agency. The date of mailing the contract or receipt to the jobseeker shall be entered thereon by the agency. The same contract or receipt shall not be used for more than one referral.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “domestic agency operating as a registry” means a domestic agency that engages in the business of obtaining and filling
commitments for domestic help.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.505.
